Nebraska, session 109, LB293A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $266,358 from the General Fund
for FY2025-26 and (2) $272,186 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Department of Labor, for Program 194, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 293, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $179,108 for FY2025-26 or
$184,482 for FY2026-27.
-1-